Nebraska, session 109, LB840.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB840 LB840
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 58-701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
58-701 Sections 58-701 to 58-712 and section 2 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Affordable Housing Act.
Sec. 2. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Accessible has the same meaning as in 24 C.F.R. 8.3, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2026; and
(b) Multifamily housing project means a project involving the
construction of one or more residential structures that, as a whole,
contain five or more dwelling units.
(2) Beginning on the effective date of this act, the Department of
Economic Development shall not approve a multifamily housing project for
assistance from the Affordable Housing Trust Fund unless:
(a) At least twenty percent of the dwelling units included in the
project will be accessible for persons with mobility impairments; and
(b) At least ten percent of the dwelling units included in the
project will be accessible for persons with hearing or vision
impairments.
Sec. 3. Original section 58-701, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is repealed.
-2-